Utah statutes.
41-12a-512.   When judgments deemed satisfied.

Judgments arising from a single accident which in the aggregate are in excess of the minimum single limit under Subsection 31A-22-304(2) shall be considered satisfied in full, for the purpose of this chapter only, when payments equal to that limit have been credited to the judgment.  Payments made by the judgment debtor prior to the judgment, but on the claim which arose out of the bodily injury, death, or property damage caused by a motor vehicle accident shall be credited in reduction of the amount necessary for the judgment to be considered satisfied in full for purposes of this chapter.  If multiple judgments against a depositor of post-accident security arise out of the same accident, and in the aggregate the several claims exceed the amount deposited, then the deposit shall be distributed pro rata, based upon each judgment creditor's portion of the total judgments arising from the accident.  Any punitive or exemplary damages awarded a judgment creditor may not be considered in determining the claimant's pro rata share.

